District of Columbia statutes.
31-2203

Maintenance of trust account.

The assets in the trust account shall be known as trusteed assets and shall at all times be in an amount equal to the U.S. branch’s reserves and other liabilities plus the minimum capital and surplus required to be maintained by a domestic insurer licensed to do the same kind of insurance.

History

May 24, 1996, D.C. Law 11-128, § 4, 43 DCR 1562

Section References

This section is referenced in § 31-2204 and § 31-2306.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-4403.